Utah statutes.
23-21-2.   Payments in lieu of property taxes on property purchased by division.

Prior to the purchase of any real property held in private ownership, the Division of Wildlife Resources shall first submit the proposition to the county legislative body in a regular open public meeting in the county where the property is located and shall by contractual agreement with the county legislative body, approved by the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources, agree to pay an amount of money in lieu of property taxes to the county.  The division shall, by contractual agreement with the county  legislative body in which any property previously acquired from private ownership and now owned by the division is located, agree to pay annually an amount of money in lieu of wildlife resource fine money, previously paid to the county.  Payments provided for in this section will not exceed what the regularly assessed real property taxes would be if the land had remained in private ownership; and these payments may not include any amount for buildings, installations, fixtures, improvements or personal property located upon the land or for those acquired, constructed or placed by the division after it acquires the land.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

